bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за кутията за контактни лещи: Чантичка за аксесоари; Кошничка за почистване; Ключодържател; Апликатор за лещи; Държач за лещи; Вложка за лещи; Поставяне на лещи; Огледало; Организаторска кутия; Бутилка за разтвор; Кутия за съхранение; Смукателна пръчица; Пинсети; Други
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมตลับคอนแทคเลนส์ที่รวมมาให้: ถุงเก็บอุปกรณ์; ตะกร้าทำความสะอาด; พวงกุญแจ; ที่ใส่เลนส์; ที่วางเลนส์; ที่ใส่เลนส์; ที่ใส่เลนส์; กระจก; กล่องจัดระเบียบ; ขวดน้ำยา; กล่องเก็บของ; แท่งดูด; แหนบ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Įtraukti kontaktinių lęšių dėklo priedai: Priedų maišelis; Valymo krepšelis; Raktų pakabukas; Lęšių aplikatorius; Lęšių laikiklis; Lęšių įdėklas; Lęšių įdėjimo įrankis; Veidrodinis; Organizatoriaus dėžutė; Tirpalo buteliukas; Sandėliavimo dėžė; Siurbimo lazdelė; Pincetai; Kita
fr: Accessoires inclus avec l’étui à lentilles de contact: Pochette d'accessoires; Panier de nettoyage; Porte-clés; Applicateur de lentilles; Support de lentilles; Insert de lentilles; Inserteur de lentilles; Miroir; Boîte de rangement; Flacon de solution; Boîte de rangement; Bâtonnet à succion; Pinces à épiler; Autre
en: Contact lens case accessories included: Accessory pouch; Cleaning basket; Keychain; Lens applicator; Lens holder; Lens insert; Lens inserter; Mirror; Organizer box; Solution bottle; Storage box; Suction stick; Tweezers; Other
da: Kontaktlinseetuiets inkluderede tilbehør: Tilbehørstaske; Rengøringskurv; Nøglering; Linseapplikator; Linseholder; Linseindsats; Linseindsætter; Spejl; Organisationsboks; Opløsningsflaske; Opbevaringskasse; Sugepind; Pincetter; Andet
pl: Dołączone akcesoria do pojemnika na soczewki: Saszetka na akcesoria; Koszyk do czyszczenia; Brelok do kluczy; Aplikator soczewek; Uchwyt na soczewki; Wkład na soczewki; Wkładacz soczewek; Lustro; Pudełko z przegródkami; Butelka na płyn; Szafka do przechowywania; Przyssawka; Pęseta; Inne
fi: Piilolinssikotelon mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Tarvikelaukku; Puhdistuskori; Avaimenperä; Linssiapplikaattori; Linssipidike; Linssilisäosa; Linssiasetin; Peili; Järjestäjälaatikko; Liuospullo; Säilytyslaatikko; Imutikku; Pinsetit; Muu
de: Kontaktlinsenbehälter-Zubehör inklusive: Zubehörtasche; Reinigungskorb; Keychain; Linsenapplikator; Linsenhalter; Linseneinsatz; Linseneinsetzhilfe; Spiegel; Organizer-Box; Lösungsflasche; Aufbewahrungskiste; Saugstäbchen; Pinzette; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 隐形眼镜盒附带配件: 配件袋; 清洁篮; 钥匙链; 镜片佩戴器; 镜片夹; 镜片内胆; 镜片插入器; 镜子; 收纳盒; 护理液瓶; 储物盒; 吸棒; 美容镊子; 其他
pt-PT: Acessórios do estojo de lentes de contacto incluídos: Bolsa de acessórios; Cesta de limpeza; Chaveiro; Aplicador de lentes; Suporte de lentes; Inserção de lentes; Insersor de lentes; Espelho; Caixa organizadora; Frasco de solução; Caixa de armazenamento; Bastão de sucção; Pinças; Outro
cs: Přiložené příslušenství pouzdra na kontaktní čočky: Pouzdro na příslušenství; Čisticí košík; Klíčenka; Aplikátor čoček; Držák čoček; Vložka na čočky; Nasazovač čoček; Zrcadlo; Organizér; Lahvička na roztok; Úložný box; Přísavná tyčinka; Pinzety; Jiné
tr: Dahil edilen lens kutusu aksesuarları: Aksesuar kesesi; Temizleme sepeti; Anahtarlık; Lens aplikatörü; Lens tutucu; Lens eklentisi; Lens yerleştirici; Ayna; Düzenleyici kutu; Solüsyon şişesi; Depolama Kutusu; Vantuz çubuğu; Cımbızlar; Diğer
ru: Аксессуары для контейнера для контактных линз в комплекте: Чехол для аксессуаров; Корзина для очистки; Брелок; Аппликатор для линз; Держатель для линз; Вкладыш для линз; Вставка для линз; Зеркальный; Органайзер; Бутылка с раствором; Ящик для хранения; Присоска-палочка; Пинцеты; Другой
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k puzdru na kontaktné šošovky v balení: Taštička na príslušenstvo; Čistiaci košík; Kľúčenka; Aplikátor šošoviek; Držiak šošoviek; Vložka na šošovky; Nasadzovač šošoviek; Zrkadlový; Organizačný box; Fľaštička na roztok; Úložný box; Prísavka; Pinzety; Iné
pt-BR: Acessórios do estojo de lentes de contato incluídos: Bolsa para acessórios; Cesto de limpeza; Chaveiro; Aplicador de lente; Suporte de lente; Inserção de lente; Insersor de lente; Espelho; Caixa organizadora; Frasco de solução; Caixa para armazenamento; Bastão de sucção; Pinças; Outro
ko: 포함된 콘택트렌즈 케이스 액세서리: 액세서리 파우치; 세척 바구니; 열쇠고리; 렌즈 어플리케이터; 렌즈 홀더; 렌즈 인서트; 렌즈 삽입기; 거울; 정리함; 세척액 병; 수납 상자; 흡착 스틱; 족집게; 기타
it: Accessori per custodia lenti a contatto inclusi: Pochette per accessori; Cestello per pulizia; Keychain; Applicatore per lenti; Porta lenti; Inserto per lenti; Inseritore per lenti; Specchio; Scatola organizer; Flacone di soluzione; Scatola portaoggetti; Bastoncino a ventosa; Pinzette; Altro
es: Accesorios de estuche para lentes de contacto incluidos: Bolsa de accesorios; Cesta de limpieza; Llavero; Aplicador de lentes; Soporte para lentes; Inserto para lentes; Insertador de lentes; Espejo; Caja organizadora; Frasco de solución; Caja de almacenamiento; Palito de succión; Pinzas; Otros
ja: 付属のコンタクトレンズケースアクセサリー: アクセサリーポーチ; クリーニングバスケット; キーチェーン; レンズアプリケーター; レンズホルダー; レンズインサート; レンズインサーター; ミラー; オーガナイザーボックス; 保存液ボトル; 収納ボックス; 吸着スティック; ピンセット; その他
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα αξεσουάρ θήκης φακών επαφής: Θήκη αξεσουάρ; Καλάθι καθαρισμού; Μπρελόκ; Εφαρμοστής φακών; Βάση φακών; Ένθετο φακών; Εισαγωγέας φακών; Καθρέφτης; Κουτί οργάνωσης; Μπουκάλι διαλύματος; Κουτί αποθήκευσης; Ράβδος αναρρόφησης; Τσιμπιδάκια φρυδιών; Άλλο
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru cutia de lentile de contact: Husă pentru accesorii; Coș de curățare; Breloc; Aplicator de lentile; Suport pentru lentile; Insert pentru lentile; Inserator de lentile; Oglindă; Cutie organizator; Sticlă pentru soluție; Cutie de depozitare; Băț cu ventuză; Pensetă; Altele
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za kutiju za kontaktne leće: Torbica za dodatke; Košarica za čišćenje; Privjesak; Aplikator za leće; Držač za leće; Umetak za leće; Umetač za leće; Ogledalo; Kutija za organizaciju; Bočica za otopinu; Kutija za pohranu; Sisaljka štapić; Pinceta; Ostalo
sv: Inkluderade tillbehör för kontaktlinsfodral: Tillbehörspåse; Rengöringskorg; Nyckelring; Linsapplikator; Linshållare; Linsinsats; Linsinsättare; Spegel; Organisationslåda; Lösningsflaska; Förvaringslåda; Sugpinne; Pincetter; Övrigt
nl: Contactlensdoos accessoires inbegrepen: Accessoiretasje; Schoonmaakmandje; Sleutelhanger; Lensapplicator; Lenshouder; Lensinzetstuk; Lensinbrenger; Spiegel; Organizer doos; Vloeistofflesje; Opslagdoos; Zuigstick; Pincetten; Andere
zh-TW: 包含的隱形眼鏡盒配件: 配件袋; 清潔籃; 鑰匙鏈; 鏡片配戴器; 鏡片固定器; 鏡片插件; 鏡片插入器; 鏡面; 收納盒; 保養液瓶; 收納盒; 吸棒; 美容鑷子; 其他
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til kontaktlinseetui: Tilbehørsveske; Rensekurv; Nøkkelring; Linseapplikator; Linseholder; Linseinnsats; Linseinnsetter; Speil; Organisasjonsboks; Oppløsningsflaske; Oppbevaringsboks; Sugepinne; Pinsetter; Annet
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za etui za kontaktne leče: Torbica za dodatke; Košarica za čiščenje; Obesek za ključe; Aplikator leč; Držalo za leče; Vložek za leče; Vstavitelj leč; Ogledalo; Organizacijska škatla; Steklenička za raztopino; Škatla za shranjevanje; Sesalna palčka; Pincete; Drugo
vi: Phụ kiện hộp kính áp tròng đi kèm: Túi phụ kiện; Giỏ làm sạch; Móc chìa khóa; Dụng cụ đeo kính áp tròng; Giá đỡ kính áp tròng; Miếng lót kính áp tròng; Dụng cụ lắp kính áp tròng; Gương; Hộp đựng có ngăn; Chai dung dịch; Hộp đựng đồ; Que hút; Nhíp; Khác
hu: Kontaktlencsetok mellékelt kiegészítői: Kiegészítő tasak; Tisztítókosár; Kulcstartó; Lencseapplikátor; Lencsetartó; Lencsebetét; Lencsebehelyező; Tükör; Rendszerező doboz; Folyadékos üveg; Tárolódoboz; Szívópálca; Csipeszek; Egyéb